Maryland, session 2026, SB0580.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
10–1703.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO THE FOLLOWING STATE DIVISIONS AND
PROGRAMS THAT PROVIDE SERVICES DIRECTLY TO THE PUBLIC:
(1) THE DEPARTMENT OF AGING, DURABLE AND MEDICAL
EQUIPMENT RE–USE PROGRAM;
(2) THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE, MARYLAND BUSINESS
EXPRESS PROGRAM;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0580*

SENATE BILL 580
(3) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR, DIVISION OF
OCCUPATIONAL AND PROFESSIONAL LICENSING;
(4) THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES, LICENSING AND
REGISTRATION SERVICE CENTERS;
(5) THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES, WILDLIFE AND
HERITAGE SERVICE;
(6) THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION, MOTOR VEHICLES
ADMINISTRATION;
(7) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH, DIVISION OF VITAL
RECORDS;
(8) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH, MARYLAND’S
COMMITMENT TO VETERANS PROGRAM;
(9) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AND MILITARY
FAMILIES, SERVICE PROGRAM OFFICES;
(10) THE MARYLAND HEALTH BENEFIT EXCHANGE;
(11) THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION, TRANSPORTATION
DIVISION; AND
(12) THE MARYLAND STATE ARCHIVES, REFERENCE SERVICES
DEPARTMENT.
(B) EACH STATE DIVISION OR PROGRAM LISTED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION SHALL PROVIDE WALK–IN SERVICE TO THE PUBLIC ON A FIRST–COME,
FIRST–SERVED BASIS:
(1) AT A REASONABLE FREQUENCY, BUT NOT LESS THAN 1 DAY PER
WEEK BETWEEN THE HOURS OF 10:00 A.M. AND 4:00 P.M.; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, AT REASONABLE
LOCATIONS.
(C) (1) A DIVISION OR PROGRAM LISTED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION THAT REGULARLY PROVIDES IN–PERSON APPOINTMENTS TO THE PUBLIC
SHALL PROVIDE WALK–IN SERVICE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION AT EACH LOCATION WHERE IN–PERSON APPOINTMENTS ARE HELD.

SENATE BILL 580 3
(2) A DIVISION OR PROGRAM LISTED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION THAT DOES NOT REGULARLY PROVIDE IN–PERSON APPOINTMENTS TO THE
PUBLIC SHALL ESTABLISH AT LEAST ONE LOCATION FOR THE PROVISION OF
WALK–IN SERVICE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.